North Carolina, session 2025, SB471.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 10 of Chapter 18C of the General Statutes reads as rewritten:
"Article 10.
"Pari-Mutuel Wagering.
"§ 18C-1000. (Reserved)
"§ 18C-1001. Definitions.
As used in this Article, the following definitions apply:
(1) Adjusted gross revenue. – The total of all moneys paid to a pari-mutuel
wagering licensee as pari-mutuel wagers minus federal excise taxes and minus
the total amount paid out to winning bettors, including the cash value of
merchandise awarded as winnings and the cash value of any incentives
provided to bettors.
(1a) Advance deposit account wager or advance deposit account wagering. – A
pari-mutuel wager on horse races in accordance with 15 U.S.C. Chapter 57
and the rules adopted by the Commission.A form of pari-mutuel wagering
made in accordance with 15 U.S.C. §§ 3001-3007 and exclusively on an ADW
wagering platform, whereby an individual may establish an account with a
person or entity licensed by the Commission and may place a pari-mutuel
wager through that account as permitted by law.
(2) ADW licensee. – Any person or entity licensed by the Commission in
accordance with this Article.Any person, including a legacy track operator and
a startup track operator, licensed by the Commission to conduct advance
deposit account wagering and accept deposits and wagers, issue a receipt or
other confirmation to the account holder evidencing such deposits and wagers,
and transfer credits and debits to and from accounts; provided, however, a
person with an ADW license that is not also a legacy track operator or a startup
*S471-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
track operator shall not offer pari-mutuel wagering on pari-mutuel wagering
devices or through simulcasting.
(2a) ADW wagering platform. – A website, mobile application, or other interactive
platform accessible via the internet, mobile, wireless, or similar
communication technology that a bettor registered to engage in advance
deposit account wagering may use to place pari-mutuel wagers through an
advance deposit account. A pari-mutuel wagering device shall not be
considered an ADW wagering platform or means to engage in advance deposit
account wagering.
(2b) Affiliate. – A person that, directly or indirectly, controls, is controlled by, or
is under common control with another person. Each member of a group of
persons acting in concert shall be deemed an affiliate of the group.
(2c) Alcoholic beverage. – Defined in G.S. 18B-101.
(2d) Bettor. – A person who is physically present in this State when placing a wager
with a pari-mutuel wagering licensee via an advance deposit wagering
account, kiosk, pari-mutuel wagering device, or window, and is eligible to and
not prohibited from placing a pari-mutuel wager under this Article.
(2e) Geofencing. – Technology approved by the Commission and utilized by a
pari-mutuel wagering licensee to verify a registered player's geolocation prior
to the time the registered player is placing a pari-mutuel wager.
(2f) Handle. – The total amount of wagers made in this State on a single horse
race.
(2g) Horse race. – A race between horses, mounted by a jockey or driven by a
driver, occurring at a horse track that is sanctioned, licensed, or both.
(2h) Horse track. – A facility that is sanctioned or licensed to host, provide, or
otherwise offer horse races.
(2i) Interstate wagering. – Pari-mutuel wagering on simulcast horse races from a
horse track located in another state or foreign country.
(2j) Key person. – An officer or director of a licensee or applicant for licensure
who is directly involved in the operation, management, or control of
pari-mutuel wagering authorized under this Article, or who exercises
substantial influence or control over the pari-mutuel wagering activities.
(2k) Kiosk. – An electronic self-betting device that allows a bettor to place a
pari-mutuel wager on a future, live horse race without an action of another
individual.
(2l) Legacy track. – A horse track in this State that meets the following
requirements:
a. Maintains a turf course for flat and steeplechase horse races.
b. Began operation as a horse track not less than 10 years before January
1, 2025.
c. Has received a sanction by the National Steeplechase Association,
Inc., to offer steeplechase horse races in this State.
d. Has conducted at least one live steeplechase horse race that was
sanctioned by the National Steeplechase Association, Inc., in the five
years prior to the submission of an application for licensure under this
Article.
(2m) Legacy track license. – A license issued by the Commission that authorizes a
legacy track operator to conduct all activities described in G.S. 18C-1003.
(2n) Legacy track operator. – A person or affiliate of that person that has been
issued a legacy track license by the Commission.
Page 2 Senate Bill 471-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2o) National Steeplechase Association, Inc. – An organization that licenses
participants, approves racecourses, trains officials, coordinates race entries,
enforces rules, compiles an official database, oversees the national marketing
and public relations of the sport of steeplechase racing, and is located in
Elkton, Maryland.
(3) Pari-mutuel wager or pari-mutuel system of wagering or pari-mutuel wagering
or mutuel wagering. – A form of wagering on the outcome of horse races,
whether live or simulcast, in which wagers are made on one or more horses
and all wagers are pooled and held by the host of the race or the ADW licensee
for distribution.Any method of wagering previously or hereafter approved by
the Commission in which one or more bettors wager on a horse race or races,
whether live, simulcast, or previously run. Wagers shall be placed in one or
more wagering pools, and wagers on different races or sets of races may be
pooled together. Bettors may establish odds or payouts, and winning bettors
share in amounts wagered including any carryover amounts, plus any amounts
provided by an association less any deductions required, as approved by the
Commission and permitted by law.
(3a) Pari-mutuel wagering device. – An electronic device made available for
pari-mutuel wagering by a legacy track operator at a legacy track or satellite
facility, or by a startup track operator at a startup track, that allows a bettor to
engage in pari-mutuel wagering on horse races that have previously been run
at a horse track, concluded with official results, and concluded without
scratches, disqualifications, or dead-heat finishes.
(3b) Pari-mutuel wagering licensee. – A person that has been issued by the
Commission a legacy track license, a startup track license, or an ADW license.
(3c) Person. – An individual, sole proprietorship, partnership, association,
fiduciary, corporation, limited liability company, or any other business entity.
(3d) Quarterhorse. – A horse that is registered with the American Quarter Horse
Association.
(3e) Satellite facility. – A facility, controlled by a legacy track operator, that is
located within a 20-mile radius of the legacy track affiliated with the legacy
track operator.
(4) Simulcast. Simulcast or simulcasting. – The telecast of live audio and visual
signals of horse races at a simulcast facility for the purpose of pari-mutuel
wagering.
(5) Simulcast facility. – Any facility approved by the Commission to simulcast
horse racing and conduct pari-mutuel wagering through an ADW
licensee.controlled by a legacy track operator or startup track operator that
offers pari-mutuel wagering on horse races provided through simulcasting.
(6) Standardbred. – A horse that is driven by a driver and registered with the
United States Trotting Association.
(6a) Standardbred track. – A horse track in this State that conducts horse races for
at least standardbred horses but not thoroughbred horses.
(7) Startup track. – An actual or proposed horse track in this State that is not a
legacy track and that hosts or intends to host horse races pursuant to this
Article.
(8) Startup track license. – A license issued by the Commission that authorizes a
startup track operator to conduct all activities described in G.S. 18C-1004.
(9) Startup track operator. – A person that has been issued a startup track license
by the Commission, and any affiliate of a person that has been issued a startup
track license by the Commission.
Senate Bill 471-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(10) Steeplechase horse race. – A horse race sanctioned by the National
Steeplechase Association.
(11) Sports wagering. – Defined in G.S. 18C-901.
(12) Sports wagering service provider. – Defined in G.S. 18C-901.
(13) Thoroughbred. – A horse that is mounted by a jockey and is registered with
The Jockey Club of New York.
(13a) Thoroughbred track. – A horse track in this State that conducts horse races for
at least thoroughbred horses but not standardbred horses.
(14) Window. – A location at a legacy track, a satellite facility, or a startup track
where a bettor places a pari-mutuel wager with an individual with or without
the assistance of a kiosk; provided, however, a bettor may not place a
pari-mutuel wager on a pari-mutuel wagering device at a window.
"§ 18C-1002. Authorizing pari-mutuel wagering.
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of Article 37 of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes,
pari-mutuel wagering and equipment used as part of pari-mutuel wagering as authorized by this
Article is lawful. All pari-mutuel wagers authorized under this Article shall be placed at a legacy
track or satellite facility controlled by a legacy track operator, a startup track controlled by a
startup track operator, or through an ADW licensee, which includes all legacy track operators
and startup track operators. The pari-mutuel wagering licensee shall comply with all of the
following:
(1) Ensure that the registered player is located within the State, and not present
on Indian lands within the State, when placing any sports wager or pari-mutuel
wager, by utilizing geofencing.
(2) Monitor and block attempts to place unauthorized pari-mutuel wagers.
(b) A license granted under this Article shall meet all of the following requirements:
(1) Be in writing and issued by the Commission.
(2) If applicable, be only for the locations identified in the license.
(3) Contain conditions required by this Article.
(c) This Article does not apply to pari-mutuel wagering conducted exclusively on Indian
lands by an Indian tribe operating in accordance with a Tribal-State gaming compact and
authorized to conduct Class III gaming pursuant to a compact with the State. For purposes of this
Article, pari-mutuel wagering is conducted exclusively on Indian lands only if the individual who
places the pari-mutuel wager is physically present on Indian lands when the pari-mutuel wager
is initiated and received by an Indian tribe operating on the same Indian lands in accordance with
a Tribal-State gaming compact and in conformity with the safe harbor requirements as provided
in 31 U.S.C. § 5362(10)(c).
(d) A pari-mutuel wagering licensee shall not, by virtue of such licensure, be authorized
to accept any pari-mutuel wager if the bettor is registered and authorized to make advanced
deposit wagers and physically present on Indian lands when the pari-mutuel wager is initiated
and received. A pari-mutuel wagering licensee shall be authorized to accept a pari-mutuel wager
only if the registered player placing the pari-mutuel wager is physically present in this State when
the pari-mutuel wager is initiated and received. Each pari-mutuel wagering licensee shall use
geofencing approved by the Commission to ensure compliance with this Article.
(e) Nothing in this Article shall apply to fantasy or simulated games or contests in which
one or more fantasy contest players compete, and winning outcomes reflect the relative
knowledge and skill of the fantasy contest players and are determined predominantly by
accumulated statistical results of the performance of individuals.
(f) Upon request, the Commission or the Department of Revenue has the authority to
give reasonable notice and thereafter audit any pari-mutuel wagering licensee and any
pari-mutuel wagering device supplier licensee as related to pari-mutuel wagering activities.
Page 4 Senate Bill 471-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(g) Nothing in this Article shall authorize the Commission to establish, require, or enforce
a maximum or minimum payout or hold percentage upon any pari-mutuel wagering licensee.
(h) All of the following persons are prohibited from engaging in pari-mutuel wagering:
(1) Any person under the age of 21.
(2) Any person who has requested and not revoked a voluntary exclusion
designation pursuant to G.S. 18C-922.
(3) Any person who has been adjudicated by law as prohibited from engaging in
pari-mutuel wagering.
(4) Any member or employee of the Commission deemed ineligible to place a
pari-mutuel wager in this State by the Commission's rules or policies.
(5) With respect to a horse race, any jockey or driver of a horse competing in the
horse race.
(i) In addition to other penalties and means of enforcement available, the occurrence of
any pari-mutuel wagering not licensed under this Article is hereby declared to be a public
nuisance, and the Commission or the district attorney exercising jurisdiction over the area of such
prohibited activity may obtain an injunction against the same in a court of competent jurisdiction.
"§ 18C-1003. Legacy track licenses.
(a) The Commission shall award two legacy track licenses if it receives two or more
qualifying applications. The Commission may award one legacy track license if only one
applicant applies or if only one applicant is qualified. If no applicant is qualified, the Commission
shall not award any legacy track license. In the event the Commission awards one legacy track
license or none, it shall accept applications for any remaining legacy track licenses after
providing 30 days' notice and not more than six months after its decision to award one legacy
track license or deny all applications.
(b) No person may apply for a legacy track license unless it or its affiliate, directly or
indirectly, at the time of the application, controls a horse track in this State that meets the
requirements to be a legacy track.
(c) The Commission shall not grant a legacy track license to any applicant if any of the
applicant's key persons are determined to be unsuitable because one of more of the following is
true with respect to a key person:
(1) The key person has been convicted by a judicial court of competent
jurisdiction in any jurisdiction, without further opportunity to appeal, of any
crime of moral turpitude, embezzlement, or larceny, or any violation of any
law pertaining to illegal gaming or gambling.
(2) In the immediate 10 years prior to the submission of the application, the key
person has been convicted by a judicial court of competent jurisdiction in any
jurisdiction, without further opportunity to appeal, of any crime that is or
would be a felony in this State.
(3) The key person has been identified in the published reports of any federal or
state legislative or executive body as being a member or associate of organized
crime.
(4) The key person has been placed and remains in the custody of any federal,
State, or local law enforcement authority.
(5) Had a racing or gaming license revoked in another jurisdiction after an
adversarial hearing and judicial review, if such grounds of revocation would
have been grounds for revoking the license in this State.
(d) Every application to the Commission for a legacy track license must include all of the
following:
(1) The range of contemplated types and modes of horse races to take place at the
legacy track.
Senate Bill 471-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) The names and addresses of all key persons associated with the applicant and
any existing or potential affiliates.
(3) The type of organizational structure under which the applicant and any
existing or potential affiliates operate, which includes, but is not limited to, a
partnership, trust, association, limited liability company, limited liability
partnership, corporation, and the address of the principal place of business of
the organization.
(4) Consent for each key person of the applicant and of any existing or potential
affiliate to undergo a background check that includes a credit history check, a
tax record check, and a criminal history record check.
(5) A financial statement prepared by and attested to by a certified public
accountant in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles
showing any debts or financial obligations owed by the applicant and the
person to whom owed, which documents shall be treated as confidential.
(6) The physical address of the legacy track, which location shall not be within a
75-mile radius of any other legacy track or startup track.
(7) The physical address of any planned satellite facility, which must be within a
20-mile radius of the applicant's legacy track.
(8) The proposed measures to address age and identity verification and
geolocation requirements.
(9) The proposed internal controls that intend to prevent ineligible persons from
engaging in pari-mutuel wagering.
(10) A written information security program detailing physical and informational
security governance.
(11) A commitment to notify the Commission within 30 days of any change in
information submitted in the application.
(12) A commitment to provide at least 10 live race days by the end of the third year
following the issuance of a legacy track license; provided, however, a legacy
track operator shall be required to conduct live horse racing within 12 months
of accepting pari-mutuel wagers on a pari-mutuel wagering device, and failure
to satisfy either of these commitments shall be grounds for revocation of the
legacy track license barring a demonstration of good cause by the licensee.
(13) Make a minimum investment of two hundred fifty million dollars
($250,000,000) in this State to redevelop the legacy track and develop the
satellite facility, and the failure to satisfy this commitment shall be grounds
for revocation of the legacy track license absent a showing of good cause by
the legacy track operator.
(14) A commitment to provide to the Commission an initial license fee of five
hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) upon award of the legacy track license,
and the failure to satisfy this commitment shall be grounds for revocation of
the legacy track license.
(15) A sworn attestation by the applicant, or the chief executive officer if the
applicant is an organization, sworn under oath that the information is true,
accurate, and complete, and the application shall be notarized.
(e) A legacy track license shall grant to the legacy track operator the authority to do all
of the following:
(1) Conduct horse races at the legacy track and allow pari-mutuel wagering on
those horse races at the legacy track and at the satellite facility.
(2) Conduct all activities of an ADW licensee, including offering and accepting
advance deposit account wagers in this State.
Page 6 Senate Bill 471-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Offer, at the legacy track and the satellite facility, in-person pari-mutuel
wagering by the use of simulcasting and by the use of not more than a total of
1,800 pari-mutuel wagering devices located at the legacy track and the
satellite facility, collectively.
(4) Offer, at the legacy track and the satellite facility, in-person sports wagering
through an interactive sports wagering operator via a written designation
agreement under Article 9 of this Chapter.
(f) At both the legacy track and the satellite facility, a legacy track operator may accept
pari-mutuel wagers through the use of advance deposit account wagering, pari-mutuel wagering
devices, ADW wagering platform, kiosks, and windows.
(g) A legacy track licensee may conduct any business authorized by the legacy track
license through an affiliate so long as the legacy track licensee informs the Commission of the
identity of the affiliate and provides the Commission with any other information of the affiliate
the Commission requires.
(h) The Commission shall review and issue legacy track licenses authorized by this
Article within 60 days of the deadline to receive completed applications; provided, however, the
Commission may extend the review period for an additional 30 days if the background
investigation is outstanding. The decision to grant and to deny an application shall be in writing.
(i) Notwithstanding Chapter 132 of the General Statutes or any other provision of law,
only the following documents under this section shall be a public record, with respect to each
applicant and each legacy track operator: (i) the name and address of each applicant, (ii) the
names of all key persons, and (iii) the granting or denial of the application.
(j) Every legacy track operator shall promptly report all of the following to the
Commission:
(1) All criminal or disciplinary proceedings commenced against the legacy track
operator in connection with its operations.
(2) All changes in key persons. All new key persons shall consent to a background
investigation.
(3) The filing of bankruptcy or other initiation of bankruptcy proceedings by the
legacy track operator.
"§ 18C-1004. Startup track licenses.
(a) Applications for startup track licenses will be evaluated on a comparative basis. One
startup track license will be for a thoroughbred track, and it shall be issued before the second
startup track license, which shall be for a standardbred horse track. Because this procurement
process is comparative, the Commission is delegated the discretion to choose which two
applicants best satisfy the criteria and purposes of this Article.
(1) The first procurement process for a startup track license will be for a
thoroughbred track.
a. The Commission will accept applications pursuant to this procurement
process on a date certain that is not less than three months nor more
than six months after the Commission awards at least one legacy track
license.
b. The Commission shall not award a startup track license for a
thoroughbred track to any applicant that does not commit to (i) making
a minimum investment of three hundred fifty million dollars
($350,000,000) in this State to develop or enhance the startup track
and (ii) offer to provide at least 50 live race days within three years of
being issued the startup track license for the thoroughbred track.
c. If the Commission determines that none of the applications qualify for
a startup track license for a thoroughbred track, the Commission shall
not award a license and commence another procurement process for
Senate Bill 471-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the purpose of issuing such a license not more than three months after
the denial of all applications.
(2) The second procurement process for a startup track license will be for a
standardbred track.
a. The Commission will accept applications pursuant to this procurement
process on a date certain that is not less than two months nor more than
four months from the date that the Commission awards a startup track
license for a thoroughbred horse track.
b. The Commission shall not award a startup track license for a
standardbred track to any applicant that does not commit to (i) make a
minimum investment of one hundred fifty million dollars
($150,000,000) in this State to develop or enhance the startup track
and (ii) offer to provide at least 20 live race days within three years of
being issued the startup track license.
(3) If the Commission determines that none of the applications qualify for a
startup track license for a standardbred horse track, the Commission shall not
award a license and commence another procurement process for the purpose
of issuing such a license in not more than one month after the denial of all
applications.
(4) A person may submit a bid for the startup track license for the thoroughbred
horse track and for the startup track license for the standardbred horse track;
provided, however, a person or an affiliate of a person that has been issued a
startup track license for a thoroughbred track may not submit an application
for the second startup track license for the standardbred horse track.
(5) The failure of any person that receives a startup track license to fulfill the
commitments required by this subsection shall be grounds for revocation of
the startup track license barring a demonstration of good cause by the licensee.
(b) Each applicant for a startup track license must provide to the Commission all of the
following:
(1) The range of contemplated types and modes of horse races to take place at the
startup track.
(2) The names and addresses of all key persons associated with the applicant and
any existing or potential affiliates.
(3) The type of organizational structure under which the applicant and any
existing or potential affiliates operate, which includes a partnership, trust,
association, limited liability company, limited liability partnership,
corporation, and the address of the principal place of business of the
organization.
(4) Consent for each key person of the applicant and of any existing or potential
affiliate to undergo a background check that includes a credit history check, a
tax record check, and a criminal history record check.
(5) A financial statement prepared by and attested to by a certified public
accountant in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles
showing any debts or financial obligations owed by the applicant and the
person to whom owed, which documents shall be treated as confidential.
(6) The physical address of the proposed startup track, which shall not be located
within 75 miles of any other startup track or legacy track.
(7) The proposed measures to address age and identity verification and
geolocation requirements.
(8) The proposed internal controls that intend to prevent ineligible persons from
engaging in pari-mutuel wagering.
Page 8 Senate Bill 471-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(9) A written information security program detailing physical and informational
security governance.
(10) A commitment to provide to the Commission an initial license fee of five
hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) upon award of the startup track license,
and the failure to satisfy this commitment shall be grounds for revocation of
the startup track license.
(11) A sworn attestation by the applicant, or the chief executive officer if the
applicant is an organization, sworn under oath that the information is true,
accurate, and complete, and the application shall be notarized.
(c) The Commission shall not grant a startup track license to any applicant if any of the
of the applicant's key persons is determined to be unsuitable on any of the grounds listed in
G.S. 18C-1003(c).
(d) A startup track license shall grant to the startup track operator the authority to do all
of the following:
(1) Conduct horse races at the startup track; provided, however, thoroughbred
horses shall not be permitted to compete in horse races at the standardbred
horse track, and standardbred horses shall not be permitted to compete in horse
races at the thoroughbred horse track.
(2) Conduct all activities of an ADW licensee, including, but not limited to,
offering and accepting advance deposit account wagers in this State.
(3) Offer pari-mutuel wagering at the startup track, including by the use of
simulcasting and not more than a total of 1,800 pari-mutuel wagering devices
at the startup track.
(4) Offer, at the startup track, in-person sports wagering through an interactive
sports wagering operator via a written designation agreement under Article 9
of this Chapter.
(5) Accept pari-mutuel wagers at the startup track through the use of advance
deposit account wagering, pari-mutuel wagering devices, ADW wagering
platforms, kiosks, and windows.
(e) A startup track operator may conduct any business authorized by the startup track
license through an affiliate so long as the startup track operator informs the Commission of the
identity of the affiliate and provides the Commission with any other information of the affiliate
the Commission requires.
(f) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, any startup track operator shall be
required to conduct live horse racing within 18 months of accepting pari-mutuel wagers on a
pari-mutuel wagering device.
(g) The Commission shall review and issue the two startup track licenses authorized by
this Article within 60 days of the deadline to receive completed applications; provided, however,
the Commission may extend the review period for an additional 30 days if the background
investigation is outstanding. The decisions to grant and to deny applications shall be in writing.
(h) Notwithstanding Chapter 132 of the General Statutes or any other provision of law,
only the following documents under this section shall be a public record, with respect to each
applicant and each startup track operator: (i) the name and address of each applicant, (ii) the
names of all key persons, and (iii) the granting or denial of the application.
(i) Every startup track operator shall promptly report all of the following to the
Commission:
(1) All criminal or disciplinary proceedings commenced against the legacy track
operator in connection with its operations.
(2) All changes in key persons. All new key persons shall consent to a background
investigation.
Senate Bill 471-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) The filing of bankruptcy or other initiation of bankruptcy proceedings by the
legacy track operator.
"§ 18C-1005. Licensure of ADW licensees.
(a) It shall be unlawful for any person to offer or accept advance deposit account wagers
in this State unless such person is an ADW licensee.licensee, a legacy track operator, or a startup
track operator.
…
"§ 18C-1006. Pari-mutuel wagering device supplier license.
(a) A pari-mutuel wagering device supplier license shall be required to sell any
pari-mutuel wagering device or totalizator to any legacy track operator and to any startup track
operator.
(b) The Commission may issue a pari-mutuel wagering device supplier license to a
qualified applicant for such license whether or not such applicant also holds another license
issued pursuant to this Article.
(c) At the request of an applicant for a pari-mutuel wagering device supplier, the
Commission may issue a provisional pari-mutuel wagering device supplier license to the
applicant so long as the applicant has submitted a completed application in accordance with this
section. A provisional license issued under this subsection expires on the date provided by the
Commission.
(d) An applicant for a pari-mutuel wagering device supplier license shall complete and
submit an application on a form prescribed by the Commission and a licensing fee of thirty
thousand dollars ($30,000). If the application is denied, the licensing fee shall be refunded, minus
five percent (5%) of the licensing fee which shall be used by the Commission to offset associated
expenses in reviewing the application. In the application, the Commission shall require applicants
to disclose the identity of each of the following:
(1) Each key person of the applicant who directly owns ten percent (10%) or more
of the applicant.
(2) Each holding, intermediary, or parent company that directly owns fifteen
percent (15%) or more of the applicant.
(3) The applicant's board appointed CEO and CFO, or the equivalent as
determined by the Commission.
(4) Any other information the Commission may deem necessary.
(e) The Commission shall conduct a background investigation on the applicant, key
persons of the applicant, and current employees of the applicant, as deemed necessary by the
Commission. The background investigation shall include a credit history check, a tax record
check, and a criminal history record check. In the event an applicant and its key persons have
had a completed criminal history record check in the 12 months prior to the application, the
Commission may, in its discretion, accept the results of that prior criminal history record check
upon submission of an affidavit that there has been no change in criminal history since the prior
criminal history record check in this or any other state. The Commission may not award a license
if the applicant or a key person of the applicant has been convicted of a felony or any gambling
offense in any state or federal court of the United States within 10 years of application or renewal.
(f) An applicant for licensure and any key person deemed necessary by the Commission
shall consent to a criminal history record check and shall submit all necessary fingerprints.
Refusal to consent to a criminal history record check may constitute grounds for the Commission
to deny licensure.
(g) The Commission shall review and issue licenses to qualified applicants within 60 days
of receipt of a completed application. The Commission may extend the review period for an
additional 30 days if the background investigation is outstanding.
(h) In disclosing the key persons of the pari-mutuel wagering device supplier applicant,
the following shall apply:
Page 10 Senate Bill 471-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Governmental created entities, including statutory authorized pension
investment boards and Canadian Crown corporations, that are direct or
indirect shareholders of an applicant shall be waived in the applicant's
disclosure of ownership and control as determined by the Commission.
(2) Investment funds or entities registered with the Securities and Exchange
Commission, including Investment Advisors and entities under the
management of the Securities and Exchange Commission, that are direct or
indirect shareholders of the applicant shall be waived in the applicant's
disclosure of ownership and control as determined by the Commission.
(i) A pari-mutuel wagering device supplier license or a provisional pari-mutuel wagering
device supplier license shall be sufficient to offer pari-mutuel wagering devices for sale to a
legacy track operator and to a startup track operator.
(j) A person holding a pari-mutuel wagering device supplier license or its equivalent, on
the basis of comparable licensing requirements issued to that person by a proper authority by
another state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia if that jurisdiction's
requirements for licensure, certification, or registration are substantially equivalent to or exceed
the requirements of this State, and who, in the opinion of the Commission otherwise meets the
requirements of this Article or of Article 9 of this Chapter, based upon verified evidence may,
upon application, be licensed as a pari-mutuel wagering device supplier with or without further
examination, as determined by the Commission.
(k) The Commission shall approve each pari-mutuel wagering device before it may be
sold by a pari-mutuel wagering device supplier to a legacy track operator or a startup track
operator; provided, however, pari-mutuel wagering devices that have been approved in other
states that allow for pari-mutuel wagering shall be approved by the Commission.
(l) Each pari-mutuel wagering device supplier shall promptly report all criminal or
disciplinary proceedings commenced against that pari-mutuel wagering device supplier in
connection with its operations to the Commission. Each pari-mutuel wagering device supplier
shall promptly report to the Commission all changes in key persons, and all new key persons
shall consent to a background investigation.
(m) No person shall offer a pari-mutuel wagering device available for use by the public
without a legacy track license or a startup track license.
"§ 18C-1007. Support for the North Carolina equine industry.
(a) There is hereby created a trust and revolving fund designated as the "Equine Breeders
Incentive Fund" for the purpose of providing rewards for breeders or owners of horses bred and
foaled in this State.
(1) The Equine Breeders Incentive Fund shall be administered by the
Commission, and the Commission shall promulgate administrative
regulations establishing the conditions and criteria for the distribution of
moneys from the fund that are consistent with this section.
(2) Revenues deposited in the Equine Breeders Incentive Fund shall be distributed
between two programs known as the Mare Incentive Program and the State
Bred Development Program. The Mare Incentive Program shall promote
horse farming and mare residency in this State, and the State Bred
Development Program shall promote North Carolina bred or initially owned
horses.
a. In years one and two of the Equine Breeders Incentive Fund, the
Commission shall allocate eighty percent (80%) of the revenues to the
Mare Incentive Program and twenty percent (20%) to the State Bred
Development Program.
b. In year three of the Equine Breeders Incentive Fund, the Commission
shall allocate seventy percent (70%) of the revenues to the Mare
Senate Bill 471-First Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Incentive Program and thirty percent (30%) to the State Bred
Development Program.
c. In year four of the Equine Breeders Incentive Fund, the Commission
shall allocate sixty percent (60%) of the revenues to the Mare Incentive
Program and forty percent (40%) to the State Bred Development
Program.
d. In year five of the Equine Breeders Incentive Fund and in every year
thereafter, the Commission shall equally allocate the revenues
between the Mare Incentive Program and the State Bred Development
Program.
(3) On at least an annual basis, the Commission shall disburse to breeders or
owners of horses moneys in the fund to be used to promote, enhance, improve,
and encourage the further and continued development of the equine industry
in North Carolina, under the administrative regulations promulgated pursuant
to this section.
(b) There is hereby created a trust and revolving fund designated as the "Equine Industry
Purse Fund" for the purpose of promoting horse racing and to provide purses for races conducted
in this State.
(1) Funds maintained in the Equine Industry Purse Fund shall be distributed to
fund purses for live horse races of thoroughbred horses, standardbred horses,
and quarterhorses occurring at a legacy horse track or a startup horse track in
this State.
(2) The Commission shall promulgate administrative regulations that set forth the
allocation of funds held by the Equine Industry Purse Fund in a manner that
is consistent with this Article. Such allocation formula shall establish a
predictable means to fix the amount of money to be paid from the Equine
Industry Purse Fund to be added to the purse provided for a qualifying horse
race. At a minimum, eight-five percent (85%) of the Equine Industry Purse
Fund shall be distributed for purses of live horse races, including steeplechase
horse races, involving thoroughbred horses; ten percent (10%) of the Equine
Industry Purse Fund shall be distributed to purses of live horse races involving
standardbred horses; and the remainder shall be distributed to purses of live
horse races involving other breeds of horses.
(c) There is hereby created the Equine Programs Fund for the purposes of supporting the
equine industry and horses in this State.
(1) The Equine Programs Fund shall be distributed into three programs known as
Aftercare, North Carolina State Equine Veterinarian Programs, and the
National Steeplechase Association.
a. Aftercare programs shall be for the benefit of thoroughbreds,
standardbreds, and quarterhorses residing at aftercare facilities in
North Carolina. The Commission shall serve as the administrative
agent for these funds and shall distribute them at least annually to
organizations engaged in accreditation and monitoring of aftercare
facilities. Recipient programs shall award funds to aftercare facilities
based in this State that have achieved and maintained levels of service
and operation achieving national accreditation.
b. Funds distributed for the purpose of North Carolina State Equine
Veterinarian Programs shall be for research, workforce, and
operational grants to accredited equine veterinarian medicine
programs in this State.
Page 12 Senate Bill 471-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. Funds distributed to the National Steeplechase Association shall be
used to promote and protect steeplechase races.
(2) The Commission shall create a formula and method for distributing funds to
the Equine Programs Fund through administrative regulation; provided,
however, the Commission shall divide Equine Programs Fund revenue as
follows:
a. Sixty-seven and one-half percent (67.5%) to North Carolina State
Veterinarian Programs.
b. Twenty percent (20%) to Aftercare programs.
c. The remainder to the National Steeplechase Association, Inc.
(d) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, all revenues in the funds created by
this section shall not revert but shall remain in each fund for purposes consistent with the fund.
"§ 18C-1008. General provisions for authorized horse races.
(a) The following acts are prohibited and may be punished as set forth in general law:
(1) No person shall knowingly enter or cause to be entered for competition, or
compete, for a prize or stake, or drive any horse, under an assumed name, or
out of its proper class, where the prize or stake is to be decided by a contest of
speed.
(2) No person shall change the name of any horse for the purpose of entry for
competition in any contest of speed, after the horse has once contested for a
prize or stake, except as provided by the code of rules of the association under
which the contest is advertised to be conducted.
(3) The class to which a horse belongs, for the purpose of an entry in any contest
of speed, shall be determined by the public performance of that horse in any
former contest or trial of speed, as provided by the rules of the Commission
under which the proposed contest is advertised to be conducted.
(4) No person shall knowingly misrepresent or fraudulently conceal the public
performance in any former contest, or trial of speed, of any horse that he
proposes to enter in a contest, whether the horse is actually entered or not.
(5) No person shall announce willfully and falsely a slower or faster time than the
time deemed actually accomplished by a horse in an official horse race.
(b) The pari-mutuel system of wagering on live or future horse races shall be operated
only by a totalizator or other mechanical equipment approved by the Commission and sold by a
pari-mutuel wagering device licensee. The Commission shall not require any particular make of
equipment.
(c) If the pari-mutuel wagering licensee so provides in its policies, and if such policies
are conspicuously posted on the pari-mutuel wagering licensee's website, any pari-mutuel ticket
issued by a pari-mutuel wagering licensee may be deemed abandoned if not collected within one
year of the date of purchase or date of relevant horse race, whichever is later. For tickets that are
deemed abandoned by operation of this subsection, on at least a quarterly basis, the pari-mutuel
wagering licensee shall pay to the Commission the value of the ticket, if any. The Commission
shall deposit all funds received pursuant to this subsection into the Equine Industry Purse Fund.
"§ 18C-1009. Administrative appeals and judicial review.
(a) If the Commission determines that the holder of a license issued under this Article
has violated any provision of this Article, the Commission may do any one or more of the
following after adhering to the procedures set forth in this section:
(1) Issue a formal warning and reprimand.
(2) Suspend the license.
(3) Revoke the license.
(4) Impose a monetary penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000)
for each violation.
Senate Bill 471-First Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) The following procedure shall apply in cases where the Commission determines that
a holder of a license issued pursuant to this Article has violated any provision of this Article:
(1) The Commission shall provide written notice to the licensee that does all of
the following:
a. Identifies the alleged conduct, the statute or regulation the conduct is
believed to have violated, and the proposed penalty for each alleged
violation.
b. Is sent by statutory overnight delivery to the registered address of the
licensee and, on the same day, also sent by electronic mail to the
licensee's corporate designee to receive notices from the Commission.
c. States that the allegation will be deemed admitted unless, within 30
days of the Commission's sending of the notice by statutory overnight
delivery, the licensee and Commission otherwise resolves the matter,
or the licensee appeals the notice as provided in this section.
(2) A licensee that has received a written notice described in this section may
appeal the allegation by commencing a contested case pursuant to Chapter
150B of the General Statutes. The appeal shall be commenced by the applicant
within 30 days of the date of receipt. Except as provided in subdivision (3) of
this subsection, the procedures set forth in Chapter 150 of the General Statutes
shall provide the exclusive mechanism for both administrative and judicial
review of the Commission's decision.
(3) If the Commission finds that the public health, safety, or welfare requires
emergency action, it may petition a court of competent jurisdiction for an
immediate injunction or other form of equitable relief, and in such matters,
the dispute will not be considered a contested case and subject to the
requirements of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.
(c) Any applicant for a license issued pursuant to this Article that contends the
Commission wrongly denied or did not renew the applicant's license or renewal application may
seek administrative and judicial review pursuant to Chapter 150B of the General Statutes as a
contested case. The applicant must commence the appeal within 30 days of the Commission's
decision to deny or not renew the applicant's license.
(d) Nonpublic record documents and materials that applicants and licensees submit to the
Commission shall become public record if such materials are specifically identified by the
Commission as providing a basis for a civil penalty, license suspension, license revocation, or
other formal or informal enforcement action undertaken by the Commission against the licensee.
This subsection does not apply to any document that is identified in G.S. 132-1.2.
"§ 18C-1010. Annual fee for ADW licensees.License renewal.
(a) Each ADW licensee shall pay an annual fee to the Commission in order to maintain
their license. The fee is one percent (1%) of the total pari-mutuel wagers placed by residents of
this State accepted by the ADW licensee in the applicable year.All licenses issued pursuant to
this Article must be renewed every five years.
(1) Not less than four nor more than six months prior to the expiration of a license,
the Commission shall provide notice to the licensee of the date the license is
set to expire by electronic mail to the corporation's designee and by statutory
overnight delivery to the licensee's registered address.
(2) Any person with a license issued pursuant to this Article shall apply to the
Commission for renewal using a form prescribed by the Commission. The
form shall not seek any additional type of information than was required to
apply for the license.
(3) The Commission shall review and approve or deny applications for license
renewal within 30 days of receiving a complete renewal application; provided,
Page 14 Senate Bill 471-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
however, the Commission may extend the review period one time for up to 30
days.
(4) The Commission shall renew any license application that continues to meet
the criteria for the license established by this Article; provided, however, the
Commission may deny an application for license renewal if the applicant's
license had been suspended twice during the prior five years, so long as the
suspensions were (i) not appealed or (ii) affirmed by last order of review.
(b) The fee shall be paid within four calendar weeks of the close of the ADW licensee's
fiscal or calendar year. The ADW licensee shall designate whether the annual fee required under
this section is payable on a fiscal year basis or a calendar year basis at the time the ADW licensee
applies for a license under G.S. 18C-1005. Once made, the designation is irrevocable during the
term of the license.An applicant seeking to renew a license issued pursuant to this Article shall
include with the renewal application a nonrefundable renewal fee as follows:
(1) For legacy track operators, startup track operators, and ADW licensees, two
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).
(2) For all other license renewals, fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).
(c) The proceeds of any application fees and annual fees collected under this Article shall
be used to offset the cost of administering the provisions of this Article and Article 9 of this
Chapter. Any proceeds remaining at the end of each fiscal year after payment of expenses of the
Commission pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the General Fund, however, the
Commission may retain an amount reasonably necessary to cover future expenses of the
Commission related to administering the provisions of this Article and Article 9 of this Chapter,
the total of which, including the amount authorized to be retained under G.S. 18C-909, may not
exceed the total expenses of the Commission related to administering the provisions of this
Article and Article 9 of this Chapter during the previous quarter of the fiscal year.
(d) The Commission may suspend or revoke the license of an ADW licensee for failure
to timely pay the annual fee required under this section.
"§ 18C-1011. Relation of legacy track licenses and startup track licenses to other provisions
of law.
Notwithstanding any local government ordinance, rule, declaration, or regulation to the
contrary, a legacy track operator or startup track operator shall be entitled to operate the track
and any allowed satellite facility as authorized by this Article at the location and physical address
identified on the track's license.
"§ 18C-1012. Compact.
The Governor of this State is authorized to execute a compact on behalf of this State with any
of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and each
territory or possession of the United States, legally joining therein in the form substantially as
follows; provided, however, the compact shall not be effective as to this State unless it is
subsequently ratified by a simple majority vote of the House of Representatives and the Senate
within two years of the Governor's execution of the compact:
"ARTICLE I
PURPOSES
SECTION 1. PURPOSES.
The purposes of this compact are to:
1. Establish uniform requirements among the party states for the licensing of
participants in live racing with pari-mutuel wagering and ensure that all such
participants who are licensed pursuant to this compact meet a uniform
minimum standard of honesty and integrity.
2. Facilitate the growth of the pari-mutuel racing industry in each party state and
nationwide by simplifying the process for licensing participants in live racing,
and reduce the duplicative and costly process of separate licensing by the
Senate Bill 471-First Edition Page 15

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
regulatory agency in each state that conducts live racing with pari-mutuel
wagering.
3. Authorize the North Carolina State Lottery Commission to participate in this
compact.
4. Provide for participation in this compact by officials of the party states, and
permit those officials, through the compact committee established by this
compact, to enter into contracts with governmental agencies and
nongovernmental persons to carry out the purposes of this compact.
5. Establish the compact committee created by this compact as an interstate
governmental entity duly authorized to request and receive criminal history
record information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and other state
and local law enforcement agencies.
ARTICLE II
DEFINITIONS
SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS.
The following definitions apply in this Compact:
1. Compact committee. – The organization of officials from the party states that
is authorized and empowered by this compact to carry out the purposes of this
compact.
2. Official. – The appointed, elected, designated or otherwise duly selected
member of a racing commission or the equivalent thereof in a party state who
represents that party state as a member of the compact committee.
3. Participants in live racing. – Participants in live racing with pari-mutuel
wagering in the party states.
4. Party state. – Any state that has enacted this compact.
5. State. – Any of the several states of the United States, the District of Columbia,
the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico and each territory or possession of the
United States.
ARTICLE III
ENTRY INTO FORCE, ELIGIBLE PARTIES AND WITHDRAWAL
SECTION 3. ENTRY INTO FORCE.
This compact shall come into force when enacted by any four (4) states. Thereafter, this
compact shall become effective as to any other state upon both (i) that state's enactment of this
compact and (ii) the affirmative vote of a majority of the officials on the compact committee as
provided in Section 8.
SECTION 4. STATES ELIGIBLE TO JOIN COMPACT.
Any state that has adopted or authorized live racing with pari-mutuel wagering shall be
eligible to become party to this compact.
SECTION 5. WITHDRAWAL FROM COMPACT AND IMPACT THEREOF ON
FORCE AND EFFECT OF COMPACT.
Any party state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing this compact,
but no such withdrawal shall become effective until the head of the executive branch of the
withdrawing state has given notice in writing of such withdrawal to the head of the executive
branch of all other party states. If as a result of withdrawals participation in this compact
decreases to less than three (3) party states, this compact no longer shall be in force and effect
unless and until there are at least three (3) or more party states again participating in this compact.
ARTICLE IV
COMPACT COMMITTEE
SECTION 6. COMPACT COMMITTEE ESTABLISHED.
There is hereby created an interstate governmental entity to be known as the "compact
committee," which shall be comprised of one (1) official from the racing commission or its
Page 16 Senate Bill 471-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
equivalent in each party state who shall be appointed, serve and be subject to removal in
accordance with the laws of the party state he represents. Pursuant to the laws of his party state,
each official shall have the assistance of his state's racing commission or the equivalent thereof
in considering issues related to licensing of participants in live racing and in fulfilling his
responsibilities as the representative from his state to the compact committee. If an official is
unable to perform any duty in connection with the powers and duties of the compact committee,
the racing commission or equivalent thereof from his state shall designate another of its members
as an alternate who shall serve in his place and represent the party state as its official on the
compact committee until that racing commission or equivalent thereof determines that the
original representative official is able once again to perform his duties as that party state's
representative official on the compact committee. The designation of an alternate shall be
communicated by the affected state's racing commission or equivalent thereof to the compact
committee as the committee's bylaws may provide.
SECTION 7. POWERS AND DUTIES OF COMPACT COMMITTEE.
In order to carry out the purposes of this compact, the compact committee is hereby granted
the power and duty to:
1. Determine which categories of participants in live horse racing, including but
not limited to owners, trainers, jockeys, grooms, mutuel clerks, racing
officials, veterinarians, and farriers, and which categories of equivalent
participants in dog racing and other forms of live racing with pari-mutuel
wagering authorized in two (2) or more of the party states, should be licensed
by the committee, and establish the requirements for the initial licensure of
applicants in each such category, the term of the license for each category, and
the requirements for renewal of licenses in each category. Provided, however,
that with regard to requests for criminal history record information on each
applicant for a license, and with regard to the effect of a criminal record on
the issuance or renewal of a license, the compact committee shall determine
for each category of participants in live racing which licensure requirements
for that category are, in its judgment, the most restrictive licensure
requirements of any party state for that category and shall adopt licensure
requirements for that category that are, in its judgment, comparable to those
most restrictive requirements.
2. Investigate applicants for a license from the compact committee and, as
permitted by federal and state law, gather information on such applicants,
including criminal history record information from the Federal Bureau of
Investigation and relevant state and local law enforcement agencies, and,
where appropriate, from the Royal Canadian Mounted Police and law
enforcement agencies of other countries, necessary to determine whether a
license should be issued under the licensure requirements established by the
committee as provided in paragraph 1 above. Only officials on, and employees
of, the compact committee may receive and review such criminal history
record information, and those officials and employees may use that
information only for the purposes of this compact. No such official or
employee may disclose or disseminate such information to any person or
entity other than another official on or employee of the compact committee.
The fingerprints of each applicant for a license from the compact committee
shall be taken by the compact committee, its employees, or its designee and,
pursuant to Public Law 92-544 or Public Law 100-413, shall be forwarded to
a state identification bureau, or to an association of state officials regulating
pari-mutuel wagering designated by the Attorney General of the United States,
for submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a criminal history
Senate Bill 471-First Edition Page 17

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
record check. Such fingerprints may be submitted on a fingerprint card or by
electronic or other means authorized by the Federal Bureau of Investigation
or other receiving law enforcement agency.
3. Issue licenses to, and renew the licenses of, participants in live racing listed in
paragraph 1 of this section who are found by the committee to have met the
licensure and renewal requirements established by the committee. The
compact committee shall not have the power or authority to deny a license. If
it determines that an applicant will not be eligible for the issuance or renewal
of a compact committee license, the compact committee shall notify the
applicant that it will not be able to process his application further. Such
notification does not constitute and shall not be considered to be the denial of
a license. Any such applicant shall have the right to present additional
evidence to, and to be heard by, the compact committee, but the final decision
on issuance or renewal of the license shall be made by the compact committee
using the requirements established pursuant to paragraph 1 of this section.
4. Enter into contracts or agreements with governmental agencies and with
nongovernmental persons to provide personal services for its activities and
such other services as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this
compact.
5. Create, appoint, and abolish those offices, employments, and positions,
including an executive director, as it deems necessary for the purposes of this
compact, prescribe their powers, duties and qualifications, hire persons to fill
those offices, employments and positions, and provide for the removal, term,
tenure, compensation, fringe benefits, retirement benefits and other conditions
of employment of its officers, employees and other positions.
6. Borrow, accept, or contract for the services of personnel from any state, the
United States, or any other governmental agency, or from any person, firm,
association, corporation or other entity.
7. Acquire, hold, and dispose of real and personal property by gift, purchase,
lease, license, or in other similar manner, in furtherance of the purposes of this
compact.
8. Charge a fee to each applicant for an initial license or renewal of a license.
9. Receive other funds through gifts, grants and appropriations.
SECTION 8. VOTING REQUIREMENTS.
A. Each official shall be entitled to one (1) vote on the compact committee.
B. All action taken by the compact committee with regard to the addition of party states
as provided in Section 3, the licensure of participants in live racing, and the receipt and
disbursement of funds shall require a majority vote of the total number of officials (or their
alternates) on the committee. All other action by the compact committee shall require a majority
vote of those officials (or their alternates) present and voting.
C. No action of the compact committee may be taken unless a quorum is present. A
majority of the officials (or their alternates) on the compact committee shall constitute a quorum.
SECTION 9. ADMINISTRATION AND MANAGEMENT.
A. The compact committee shall elect annually from among its members a chairman, a
vice chairman, and a secretary/treasurer.
B. The compact committee shall adopt bylaws for the conduct of its business by a
two-thirds (2/3) vote of the total number of officials (or their alternates) on the committee at that
time and shall have the power by the same vote to amend and rescind these bylaws. The
committee shall publish its bylaws in convenient form and shall file a copy thereof and a copy of
any amendments thereto with the Secretary of State or equivalent agency of each of the party
states.
Page 18 Senate Bill 471-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
C. The compact committee may delegate the day-to-day management and administration
of its duties and responsibilities to an executive director and his support staff.
D. Employees of the compact committee shall be considered governmental employees.
SECTION 10. IMMUNITY FROM LIABILITY FOR PERFORMANCE OF OFFICIAL
RESPONSIBILITIES AND DUTIES.
No official of a party state or employee of the compact committee shall be held personally
liable for any good faith act or omission that occurs during the performance and within the scope
of his responsibilities and duties under this compact.
ARTICLE V
RIGHTS AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF EACH PARTY STATE
SECTION 11. RIGHTS AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF EACH PARTY STATE.
A. By enacting this compact, each party state:
1. Agrees (i) to accept the decisions of the compact committee regarding the
issuance of compact committee licenses to participants in live racing pursuant
to the committee's licensure requirements, and (ii) to reimburse or otherwise
pay the expenses of its official representative on the compact committee or his
alternate.
2. Agrees not to treat a notification to an applicant by the compact committee
under paragraph 3 of Section 7 that the compact committee will not be able to
process his application further as the denial of a license, or to penalize such
an applicant in any other way based solely on such a decision by the compact
committee.
3. Reserves the right (i) to charge a fee for the use of a compact committee
license in that state, (ii) to apply its own standards in determining whether, on
the facts of a particular case, a compact committee license should be
suspended or revoked, (iii) to apply its own standards in determining licensure
eligibility, under the laws of that party state, for categories of participants in
live racing that the compact committee determines not to license and for
individual participants in live racing who do not meet the licensure
requirements of the compact committee, and (iv) to establish its own licensure
standards for the licensure of nonracing employees at pari-mutuel racetracks
and employees to separate satellite wagering facilities. Any party state that
suspends or revokes a compact committee license shall, through its racing
commission or the equivalent thereof or otherwise, promptly notify the
compact committee of that suspension or revocation.
B. No party state shall be held liable for the debts or other financial obligations incurred
by the compact committee.
ARTICLE VI
CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
SECTION 12. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY.
This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate its purposes. The provisions of
this compact shall be severable, and, if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this compact
is declared to be contrary to the Constitution of the United States or of any party state, or the
applicability of this compact to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid,
the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government,
agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If all or some portion of this
compact is held to be contrary to the constitution of any party state, the compact shall remain in
full force and effect as to the remaining party states and in full force and effect as to the state
affected as to all severable matters."
"§ 18C-1013. Simulcasting.
Senate Bill 471-First Edition Page 19

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) Only legacy track operators and startup track operators may offer pari-mutuel
wagering on simulcasted horse races.
(b) Placing a pari-mutuel wager on an ADW wagering platform shall not be deemed
pari-mutuel wagering on simulcasted horse races.
(c) A track operator may offer pari-mutuel wagering on simulcasted horse races at only
the track and, as applicable, the satellite facility, identified in its track license.
(d) Every legacy track operator and startup track operator shall provide a separate
accounting on all interstate simulcasting to the Commission on a form and at such times, not
more than monthly, as required by the Commission.
(e) The use of an interstate common wagering pool is authorized. For purposes of this
subsection, an "interstate common wagering pool" means a pari-mutuel pool established in one
horse racing jurisdiction that is combined with comparable pari-mutuel pools from at least one
other horse racing jurisdiction for the purpose of establishing payoff prices in the various
jurisdictions.
(1) Interstate wagers made at a track may form an interstate common wagering
pool with wagers at a track in another jurisdiction, and the track may adopt
the commission and breakage rates of the track at which the race is being run.
The Commission may also approve types of wagering, distribution of
winnings, and rules of racing for interstate common wagering pools that are
different from those that normally apply in the State.
(2) Wagers placed on any races run at a legacy track or a startup track may be
combined with wagers placed at tracks in other jurisdictions to form an
interstate common wagering pool located either within or outside North
Carolina.
(3) A legacy track operator's or a startup track operator's participation in an
interstate common wagering pool does not cause the subject legacy track or
startup track to be considered to be doing business in any jurisdiction other
than the jurisdiction where the track is physically located. Excise taxes and
commission rates may not be imposed on any interstate common wagering
pool other than on amounts actually wagered in North Carolina. The
combination of pari-mutuel pools as provided in this section constitutes the
communication of wagering information for purposes of calculating odds and
payoffs only and does not constitute the transfer of wagers in interstate
commerce.
"§ 18C-1014. Transferability and assignability of pari-mutuel wagering licenses.
(a) Any license issued pursuant to this Article may be assigned or transferred to a third
party, pursuant to a sale or otherwise; provided, however, no such assignment or transfer shall
be effective until and unless the Commission approves the assignment or transfer as set forth in
this section.
(b) Before any person seeking to acquire a license issued pursuant to this Article by
assignment or transfer may take possession of the license, the licensee and the person to acquire
the license shall notify the Commission by submitting to the Commission a letter of intent of the
proposed transfer or assignment on a form prescribed by the Commission.
(c) Not less than 30 nor more than 45 days after providing the Commission with the letter
of intent, the person seeking to acquire the license shall submit an application to the Commission.
(1) An application for the acquisition of a legacy track license shall not be
approved by the Commission unless the applicant demonstrates that it satisfies
the criteria set forth in G.S. 18C-1003(b) and (c). Any transferred or assigned
legacy track license shall be under the same terms and conditions as the
original legacy track license.
Page 20 Senate Bill 471-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) An application for the acquisition of a startup track license shall not be
approved by the Commission unless the applicant demonstrates that it satisfies
the criteria set forth in G.S. 18C-1004(b) and (e). Any transferred or assigned
startup track license shall be under the same terms and conditions as the
original startup track license.
(3) An application for the acquisition of an ADW license or a pari-mutuel
wagering device supplier license shall not be approved unless the Commission
determines the application satisfies all conditions of the original license.
"§ 18C-1015. Wagering.
(a) An individual resident of this State desiring to place pari-mutuel wagers through
means other than a pari-mutuel wagering device, a kiosk, or at a window shall establish an
account with an ADW licensee a pari-mutuel wagering licensee for that purpose. The ADW
pari-mutuel wagering licensee is responsible for verifying the identity of the individual and
ensuring that the individual is at least 21 years of age.
(b) The following are prohibited from engaging in pari-mutuel wagering under this
Article:
(1) Any person under the age of 21.
(2) Any person who has been adjudicated by law as prohibited from engaging in
pari-mutuel wagering.
(3) Any member or employee of the Commission. The Commission shall provide
a list of individuals subject to this subdivision to each ADW pari-mutuel
wagering licensee at least quarterly.
(4) Any person who has requested and not revoked a voluntary exclusion
designation from sports wagering pursuant to G.S. 18C-922. Participation in
the voluntary exclusion program shall not preclude an ADW a pari-mutuel
wagering licensee and its agents from seeking the payment of a debt accrued
by the individual while not participating in the voluntary exclusion program.
(c) An ADW A pari-mutuel wagering licensee shall make commercially reasonable
efforts to ensure that any prohibited person under this section is prevented from placing a
pari-mutuel wager with the ADW pari-mutuel wagering licensee.
(d) Any member of the Commission determined to have placed a pari-mutuel wager with
an ADW a pari-mutuel wagering licensee shall be deemed to have resigned from the Commission
as of the time the pari-mutuel wager is placed. Any employee of the Commission determined to
have placed a pari-mutuel wager with an ADW licensee is subject to disciplinary action.
(e) This Article does not authorize non-pari-mutuel wagering on the outcome of live,
simulcast, past, or any other horse races.
(f) The ADW licensee and their agents shall ensure that all advertisements and marketing
of advance deposit account wagering meet all of the following requirements:
(1) It does not target persons under the age of 21.
(2) It discloses the identity of the ADW pari-mutuel wagering licensee.
(3) It provides information about or links to resources related to gambling
addiction and prevention.
(4) It is not misleading to a reasonable person.
(5) It satisfies the rules and requirements promulgated by the Commission.
"§ 18C-1016. Amending licenses.
(a) By providing notice to the Commission, a legacy track operator or startup track
operator may relocate the track and, as applicable, the satellite facility, anywhere in the county
identified on the track license.
(b) No track operator may relocate a track pursuant to this section if such relocation
results in another track of the same license type falling within a 75-mile radius from the proposed
Senate Bill 471-First Edition Page 21

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
site of relocation. No legacy track operator shall relocate a satellite facility to any location that is
outside of a 20-mile radius of the legacy track.
"§ 18C-1017. Reports of the Commission.
(a) The Commission shall identify on its website the name and address of all legacy track
operators, startup track operators, ADW licensees, and pari-mutuel wagering device supplier
licensees.
(b) On an annual basis, the Commission shall report to the General Assembly the number
of authorized horse races taking place in this State, the type of horses competing at the horse
races, and the revenue generated for the General Fund and for each of the funds created by
G.S. 18C-1007 by pari-mutuel wagering at such horse races; provided, however, any such report
will separately identify revenue raised by the use of pari-mutuel wagering devices.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit the information the Commission may
provide.
"§ 18C-1018. (Reserved)
"§ 18C-1019. (Reserved)
"§ 18C-1020. Criminal penalties.
(a) Any person who knowingly offers or engages in pari-mutuel wagering in violation of
this Article shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.
(b) Any person under the age of 21 who engages in pari-mutuel wagering as defined
under this Article shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.
(c) Any person who knowingly attempts to suborn, collude, or otherwise conspire to
influence the outcome of any competition or aspect of any competition that is the subject of
pari-mutuel wagering pursuant to this Article shall be guilty of a Class G felony.
(d) Any person applying to become an ADW a pari-mutuel wagering licensee who
willfully furnishes, supplies, or otherwise gives false information on the license application shall
be guilty of a Class I felony.
(e) Nothing in this Article shall be construed to allow the ADW pari-mutuel wagering
licensee to be charged with a violation of subsection (a) or (c) of this section absent actual notice
and knowledge that a person is under age or giving false information.
"§ 18C-1021. (Reserved)
"§ 18C-1022. (Reserved)
"§ 18C-1023. (Reserved)
"§ 18C-1024. (Reserved)
"§ 18C-1025. Rulemaking.
(a) The Commission shall adopt rules governing the conduct of horse racing in this State,
which shall include rules regarding play of live horse racing and the placement of pari-mutuel
wagers on simulcast horse races. In adopting rules, the Commission shall consult the State
Veterinarian regarding safety of horses.
(b) When adopting rules, the Commission shall provide guidance on the issuance, denial,
suspension, or revocation of a license provided under this Article, on the operation of advance
deposit account wagering by ADW pari-mutuel wagering licensees, and on the requirements for
simulcast facilities."
SECTION 2.(a) Chapter 105 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 2F.
"Taxes on Pari-Mutuel Wagering.
"§ 105-113.150. Definitions.
The definitions of G.S. 18C-1001 and, to the extent they do not conflict, G.S. 18C-901, apply
in this Article.
"§ 105-113.151. Taxes on pari-mutuel wagering.
(a) Taxes. – The following taxes are imposed:
Page 22 Senate Bill 471-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Pari-mutuel wagering devices. – A tax at the rate of twenty-nine percent (29%)
is imposed on each legacy track operator and startup track operator for the
privilege of being licensed under Article 10 of Chapter 18C of the General
Statutes. The tax applies to the adjusted gross revenue derived from
pari-mutuel wagering on all pari-mutuel wagering devices.
(2) Pari-mutuel wagering. – A tax rate of one and one-half percent (1.5%) is
imposed on each legacy track operator, startup track operator, and ADW
licensee for the privilege of being licensed under Article 10 of Chapter 18C
of the General Statutes. The tax applies to the total handle of each horse race
for which the pari-mutuel wagering licensee accepted pari-mutuel wagers;
provided, however, the tax does not apply to pari-mutuel wagers made on
pari-mutuel wagering devices. For purposes of the tax authorized by this
subdivision, the handle for each horse race shall include pari-mutuel wagers
made in person at a licensed legacy track, a satellite facility operated by a
legacy track operator, a licensed startup track, and pari-mutuel wagers made
through an advance deposit wagering account, regardless of whether the horse
race occurred in this State or in another jurisdiction.
(b) Return. – Taxes levied by this Article are due when a return is required to be filed.
The return is due on a monthly basis. A monthly return is due by the twentieth day of the month
following the calendar month covered by the return. The return shall be filed on a form prescribed
by the Secretary.
(c) Records. – A person required to file a return under this Article must keep a record of
all documents needed to verify the information in the return. The records shall be open at all
times for inspection by the Secretary or the Secretary's authorized representative and shall be
kept for the applicable period of statute of limitations as set forth under Article 9 of this Chapter.
(d) Refund. – A pari-mutuel wagering licensee is allowed a refund of any tax paid under
this section on a pari-mutuel wager that has been refunded. The Secretary shall prescribe the
manner in which a pari-mutuel wagering licensee may request a refund under this subsection,
which may include allowing a credit for the amount refunded on a subsequent monthly return
required under this section.
"§ 105-113.152. Registration and discontinuance requirements.
(a) Registration Required. – A pari-mutuel wagering licensee must register with the
Secretary.
(b) Registration Form. – Registration must be on a form prescribed by the Secretary and
include all information requested. If a pari-mutuel wagering licensee fails to register, the
Secretary must notify the Commission of the violation.
(c) Discontinuance of Authorized Activities. – A pari-mutuel wagering licensee who
changes ownership or stops engaging in the activities licensed under Article 10 of Chapter 18C
of the General Statutes must notify the Secretary in writing of the change.
"§ 105-113.153. Use of tax proceeds.
The Secretary shall distribute the taxes collected under this Article, less the allowance to the
Department of Revenue and reimbursement to the Commission for administrative expenses, in
accordance with this section. The Secretary may retain the cost of administering this Article, not
to exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) a year, as reimbursement to the Department.
The Commission shall, no later than 20 days after the end of the month, notify the Department
of its unreimbursed expenses from administering the provisions of Article 10 of Chapter 18C of
the General Statutes from the previous month. The Department shall reimburse the Commission
from the tax revenues collected under this Article no later than the end of the month in which the
Department was notified. The remaining proceeds shall be credited as follows:
(1) Net proceeds of the tax collected pursuant to G.S. 105-113.151(a)(1) shall be
credited as follows:
Senate Bill 471-First Edition Page 23

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. Sixty-nine percent (69%) to the General Fund.
b. Twenty-one percent (21%) to the Commission for allocation to the
Equine Industry Purse Fund created by G.S. 18C-1007.
c. Nine and one-half percent (9.5%) to the Commission for allocation to
the Equine Breeders Incentive Fund created by G.S. 18C-1007.
d. The remainder to the Commission for allocation to the Equine
Programs Fund created by G.S. 18C-1007.
(2) Net proceeds of the tax collected pursuant to G.S. 105-113.151(a)(2) shall be
credited as follows:
a. One-third (33.3%) to the Equine Industry Purse Fund;
b. One-third (33.3%) to the Equine Breeders Incentive Fund; and
c. The remaining funds split equally between the General Fund and the
Equine Programs Fund created by G.S. 18C-1007."
SECTION 2.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies to
pari-mutuel wagers received on or after that date.
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 18C-901 reads as rewritten:
"§ 18C-901. Definitions.
As used in this Article, the following definitions apply:
…
(7a) Horse racing track. – Any of the following licensed under Article 10 of this
Chapter:
a. Legacy track, as defined in G.S. 18C-1001.
b. Startup track, as defined in G.S. 18C-1001.
…
(17) Sports facility. – Any of the following:
a. A motorsports facility.
b. A facility that hosts a professional golf tournament.
c. A facility that is the home location of a professional sports team.
d. A horse racing track.
…."
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 18C-905 reads as rewritten:
"§ 18C-905. Written designation agreements.
(a) In order to qualify as an interactive sports wagering operator, the applicant shall be a
party to a written designation agreement with one of the following:
(1) A professional sports team.
(2) The owner or operator of one of the following:
a. A motorsports facility.
b. A facility that hosts a professional golf tournament annually.
c. A horse racing track.
(3) A sports governing body that annually within the calendar year sanctions more
than one National Association for Stock Car Auto Racing national touring race
in the State.
(4) A sports governing body that annually within the calendar year sanctions more
than one professional golf tournament.
…."
SECTION 3.(c) G.S. 18C-926(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Permanent places of public accommodation permitted under this section shall be
located as follows:
(1) On the property of the sports facility.
(2) No more than one place of public accommodation may be on other property
owned or controlled by the owner or operator of the sports facility or an
Page 24 Senate Bill 471-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
affiliated entity of the owner or operator of the sports facility that is located
within a one-half mile radius of a sports facility as defined in
G.S. 18C-901(17)a. or G.S. 18C-901(17)c.
(3) No more than one place of public accommodation may be on other property
owned or controlled by the owner or operator of the sports facility that is
located within a one and one-half mile radius of a sports facility as defined in
G.S. 18C-901(17)b.
(4) At a satellite facility, as defined in G.S. 18C-1001."
SECTION 4.(a) G.S. 18B-1000 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(4b) Horse racing track. – Any of the following:
a. A legacy track licensed under Article 10 of Chapter 18C of the General
Statutes.
b. A startup track licensed under Article 10 of Chapter 18C of the
General Statutes.
c. A satellite facility, as defined in G.S. 18C-1001."
SECTION 4.(b) G.S. 18B-1006 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(k1) Horse Racing Track Permits. – The Commission may issue the permits listed in
G.S. 18B-1001, without approval at an election, to a horse racing track."
SECTION 5.(a) G.S. 14-295 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-295. Keeping gaming tables, illegal punchboards or slot machines, or betting thereat.
If Except as provided in Article 10 of Chapter 18C of the General Statutes, if any person shall
establish, use or keep any gaming table (other than a faro bank), by whatever name such table
may be called, an illegal punchboard or an illegal slot machine, at which games of chance shall
be played, he shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor; and every person who shall play thereat
or thereat bet any money, property or other thing of value, whether the same be in stake or not,
shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor."
SECTION 5.(b) G.S. 14-296 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-296. Illegal slot machines and punchboards defined.
An illegal slot machine or punchboard within the contemplation of G.S. 14-295 through
14-298 is defined as a device where the user may become entitled to receive any money, credit,
allowance, or anything of value, as defined in G.S. 14-306. This section does not apply to any
activity conducted pursuant to Article 10 of Chapter 18C of the General Statutes."
SECTION 5.(c) G.S. 14-297 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-297. Allowing gaming tables, illegal punchboards or slot machines on premises.
If Except as provided in Article 10 of Chapter 18C of the General Statutes, if any person shall
knowingly suffer to be opened, kept or used in his house or on any part of the premises occupied
therewith, any of the gaming tables prohibited by G.S. 14-289 through 14-300 or any illegal
punchboard or illegal slot machine, he shall forfeit and pay to anyone who will sue therefor two
hundred dollars ($200.00), and shall also be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor."
SECTION 5.(d) G.S. 14-301 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-301. Operation or possession of slot machine; separate offenses.
It shall be unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to operate, keep in his possession or
in the possession of any other person, firm or corporation, for the purpose of being operated, any
slot machine or device where the user may become entitled to receive any money, credit,
allowance, or anything of value, as defined in G.S. 14-306. Each time said machine is operated
as aforesaid shall constitute a separate offense. This section does not apply to any activity
conducted pursuant to Article 10 of Chapter 18C of the General Statutes."
SECTION 5.(e) G.S. 14-302 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-302. Punchboards, vending machines, and other gambling devices; separate offenses.
It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to operate or keep in his possession,
or the possession of any other person, firm, or corporation, for the purpose of being operated, any
Senate Bill 471-First Edition Page 25

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
punchboard, slot machine or device where the user may become entitled to receive any money,
credit, allowance, or anything of value, as defined in G.S. 14-306. Each time said punchboard,
slot machine or device where the user may become entitled to receive any money, credit,
allowance, or anything of value, as defined in G.S. 14-306 is operated, played, or patronized by
the paying of money or other thing of value therefor, shall constitute a separate violation of this
section as to operation thereunder. This section shall not apply to any activity conducted pursuant
to Article 10 of Chapter 18C of the General Statutes."
SECTION 5.(f) G.S. 14-304 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-304. Manufacture, sale, etc., of slot machines and devices.
It shall be unlawful to manufacture, own, store, keep, possess, sell, rent, lease, let on shares,
lend or give away, transport, or expose for sale or lease, or to offer to sell, rent, lease, let on
shares, lend or give away, or to permit the operation of, or for any person to permit to be placed,
maintained, used or kept in any room, space or building owned, leased or occupied by him or
under his management or control, any slot machine or device where the user may become entitled
to receive any money, credit, allowance, or anything of value, as defined in G.S. 14-306. This
section shall not apply to any activity conducted pursuant to Article 10 of Chapter 18C of the
General Statutes."
SECTION 5.(g) G.S. 14-305 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-305. Agreements with reference to slot machines or devices made unlawful.
It shall be unlawful to make or permit to be made with any person any agreement with
reference to any slot machines or device where the user may become entitled to receive any
money, credit, allowance, or an thing of value, as defined in G.S. 14-306 pursuant to which the
user thereof may become entitled to receive any money, credit, allowance, or anything of value
or additional chance or right to use such machines or devices, or to receive any check, slug, token
or memorandum entitling the holder to receive any money, credit, allowance or thing of value.
This section shall not apply to any activity conducted pursuant to Article 10 of Chapter 18C of
the General Statutes."
SECTION 5.(h) G.S. 14-306.1A is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to make illegal any activity conducted
pursuant to Article 10 of Chapter 18C of the General Statutes."
SECTION 5.(i) G.S. 14-306.4 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(d1) Nothing in this section shall be construed to make illegal any activity conducted
pursuant to Article 10 of Chapter 18C of the General Statutes."
SECTION 6. The North Carolina State Lottery Commission shall announce a date
certain that it will begin accepting applications for legacy track licenses issued under Article 10
of Chapter 18C of the General Statutes; provided, that such date shall not be earlier than three
months nor later than four months from July 1, 2025. The Commission shall also provide 30 days'
notice of the date chosen.
SECTION 7. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 26 Senate Bill 471-First Edition